Illinois, session 104th, SB3845.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sports Wagering Act is amended by changing 5Section 25-90 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 45/25-90)7    Sec. 25-90. Tax; Sports Wagering Fund. 8    (a) For the privilege of holding a license to operate 9sports wagering under this Act until June 30, 2024, this State 10shall impose and collect 15% of a master sports wagering 11licensee's adjusted gross sports wagering receipts from sports 12wagering. The accrual method of accounting shall be used for 13purposes of calculating the amount of the tax owed by the 14licensee.15    The taxes levied and collected pursuant to this subsection 16(a) are due and payable to the Board no later than the last day 17of the month following the calendar month in which the 18adjusted gross sports wagering receipts were received and the 19tax obligation was accrued.20    (a-5) In addition to the tax imposed under subsection (a), 21(d), (d-5), or (d-7) of this Section, for the privilege of 22holding a license to operate sports wagering under this Act, 23the State shall impose and collect 2% of the adjusted gross   SB3845- 2 -LRB104 17767 LNS 31199 b1receipts from sports wagers that are placed within a home rule 2county with a population of over 3,000,000 inhabitants, which 3shall be paid, subject to appropriation from the General 4Assembly, from the Sports Wagering Fund to that home rule 5county for the purpose of enhancing the county's criminal 6justice system.7    (b) The Sports Wagering Fund is hereby created as a 8special fund in the State treasury. Except as otherwise 9provided in this Act, all moneys collected under this Act by 10the Board shall be deposited into the Sports Wagering Fund. 11Through August 25, 2024, on the 25th of each month, any moneys 12remaining in the Sports Wagering Fund in excess of the 13anticipated monthly expenditures from the Fund through the 14next month, as certified by the Board to the State 15Comptroller, shall be transferred by the State Comptroller and 16the State Treasurer to the Capital Projects Fund. Beginning 17September 25, 2024, on the 25th of each month, of the moneys 18remaining in the Sports Wagering Fund in excess of the 19anticipated monthly expenditures from the Fund through the 20next month, as certified by the Board to the State 21Comptroller, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 22Treasurer shall transfer 58% to the General Revenue Fund and 2342% to the Capital Projects Fund. 24    (c) Beginning with July 2021, and on a monthly basis 25thereafter, the Board shall certify to the State Comptroller 26the amount of license fees collected in the month for initial   SB3845- 3 -LRB104 17767 LNS 31199 b1licenses issued under this Act, except for occupational 2licenses. As soon after certification as practicable, the 3State Comptroller shall direct and the State Treasurer shall 4transfer the certified amount from the Sports Wagering Fund to 5the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund. 6    (d) Beginning on July 1, 2024, and for each 12-month 7period thereafter, for the privilege of holding a license to 8operate sports wagering under this Act, this State shall 9impose a privilege tax on the master sports licensee's 10adjusted gross sports wagering receipts from sports wagering 11over the Internet or through a mobile application based on the 12following rates: 13        20% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 14    up to and including $30,000,000.15        25% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 16    in excess of $30,000,000 but not exceeding $50,000,000.17        30% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 18    in excess of $50,000,000 but not exceeding $100,000,000.19        35% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 20    in excess of $100,000,000 but not exceeding $200,000,000.21        40% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 22    in excess of $200,000,000. 23    (d-5) Beginning on July 1, 2024, and for each 12-month 24period thereafter, for the privilege of holding a license to 25operate sports wagering under this Act, this State shall 26impose a privilege tax on the master sports licensee's   SB3845- 4 -LRB104 17767 LNS 31199 b1adjusted gross sports wagering receipts from sports wagering 2from other than over the Internet or through a mobile 3application based on the following rates: 4        20% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 5    up to and including $30,000,000.6        25% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 7    in excess of $30,000,000 but not exceeding $50,000,000.8        30% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 9    in excess of $50,000,000 but not exceeding $100,000,000.10        35% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 11    in excess of $100,000,000 but not exceeding $200,000,000.12        40% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 13    in excess of $200,000,000.14    (d-7) (Blank). Beginning on July 1, 2025, and each month 15thereafter, for the privilege of holding a license to operate 16sports wagering under this Act, this State shall impose a 17wager tax on each master sports licensee for each individual 18wager placed with the master sports licensee for sports 19wagering over the Internet or through a mobile application. 20The tax shall be based on the following schedule and shall be 21in addition to any other taxes or fees imposed under this Act:22    The tax shall be $0.25 per wager for the first 20,000,000 23annual combined Tier 1 and Tier 2 wagers.24    The tax shall be $0.50 per wager for each wager in excess 25of 20,000,000 annual combined Tier 1 and Tier 2 wagers.26    The tax levied under this subsection shall be deposited   SB3845- 5 -LRB104 17767 LNS 31199 b1monthly into the Sports Wagering Fund. The Board shall certify 2all amounts deposited into the Sports Wagering Fund under this 3subsection to the State Comptroller. The State Comptroller 4shall direct and the State Treasurer shall transfer that 5certified amount from the Sports Wagering Fund to the General 6Revenue Fund.7    As used in this subsection, "annual combined Tier 1 and 8Tier 2 wagers" means the total number of individual wagers 9placed with the licensee, regardless of outcome or payout in a 10given fiscal year.11    (d-10) The accrual method of accounting shall be used for 12purposes of calculating the amount of the tax owed by the 13licensee.14    (d-15) The taxes levied and collected pursuant to 15subsections (d) (d-5), and (d-7) are due and payable to the 16Board no later than the last day of the month following the 17calendar month in which the adjusted gross sports wagering 18receipts were received and the tax obligation was accrued. 19    (e) Annually, a master sports wagering licensee shall 20transmit to the Board an audit of the financial transactions 21and condition of the licensee's total operations. 22Additionally, within 90 days after the end of each quarter of 23each fiscal year, the master sports wagering licensee shall 24transmit to the Board a compliance report on engagement 25procedures determined by the Board. All audits and compliance 26engagements shall be conducted by certified public accountants   SB3845- 6 -LRB104 17767 LNS 31199 b1selected by the Board. Each certified public accountant must 2be registered in the State of Illinois under the Illinois 3Public Accounting Act. The compensation for each certified 4public accountant shall be paid directly by the master sports 5wagering licensee to the certified public accountant. 6(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 104-6, eff. 6-16-25.)